Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8719
Nonidentifiable information; disclosure.

A patient safety organization may disclose nonidentifiable information, including nonidentifiable aggregate trend data and educational material developed as a result of the patient safety work product reported to it.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 19.